Washington statutes.
RCW 3.02.010

Court of limited jurisdiction defined.

For purposes of this chapter, a court of limited jurisdiction is any court organized under Titles 3, 35, or 35A RCW.

[ 1980 c 162 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective dates, savings—1980 c 162: "Sections 1 through 4 of this 1980 act shall take effect on January 1, 1981, and shall apply to civil or criminal actions commenced on or after January 1, 1981. Sections 8 and 9 of this 1980 act shall take effect on May 1, 1980." [ 1980 c 162 s 13.]

Severability—1980 c 162: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1980 c 162 s 12.]